District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.99

Foreign corporations — Admission to transact business; procurement of certificate of authority limited in certain cases; service of process; rules and regulations.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 219, ch. 269, § 99
Sept. 19, 1966, 80 Stat. 813, Pub. L. 89-591, § 2
Mar. 14, 1984, D.C. Law 5-64, § 2(b), 31 DCR 195
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 441(a), 32 DCR 4450
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(ii), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.99.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.
1973 Ed., § 29-933.